DI-506
DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTAL RESTRAINT SYSTEM

DIAT4-01

DTC B0117/45 Short in Side Squib LH Circuit
(to Ground)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The side squib LH circuit consists of the airbag sensor assembly and the side airbag assembly LH.
It causes the SRS to deploy when the SRS deployment conditions are satisfied.

For details of the function of each component, see OPERATION on page RS-3.

DTCBO0 117/45isrecorded when ground shortis detected inthe side squib LH circuit.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
« Shortin side squib LH circuit (to ground) « Side airbag assembly LH (Side squib LH)
B0117/45 « Side squib LH malfunction * Airbag sensor assembly
« Airbag sensor assembly malfunction e FloorNo. 1 wire
HINT:

DTCBO 117/45isindicated only forthe vehicle equipped with the side airbag.

WIRING DIAGRAM
See page DI-499.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Prepare for inspection (See step 1 on page DI-764).

-

2CHeckfloorNo. 1 wire(side squibLH circuit).

CHECK:
Floor No. 1 Wire Measure the resistance between the body ground and SFL+ of
Side Squib LH thefloorNo. 1 wireconnectoronthe side airbagassembly LH
CD :l (side squib LH) side.
Airbag OK:
Sensor Resistance: 1 MQ orHigher
:l Assembly
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Ho1016 NG% pairorreplacefloorNo. 1 wire.
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3 | Check airbag sensor assembly.
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PREPARATION:

(@ Connect the connector to the airbag sensor assembly.

(b) Using a service wire, connect SFL+ and SFL- of the floor
No. 1 wire connector on the side airbag assembly LH
(side squib LH) side.

() Connect the negative (-) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:

(@  Turnthe ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI-432).

(c) Turntheignition switchto LOCK, and waitatleastfor 10
seconds.

(d) Turntheignition switchto ON, and wait at least for 10se-
conds.

(e) Check the DTC (See page DI-432).

K:

DTCBO 117/45is not output.
HINT:
Codesotherthancode B0 117/45may be outputatthistime, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG> Replace airbag sensor assembly.
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4 | Check side squib LH.
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PREPARATION:

(@  Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.

(b) Disconnect the negative (-) terminal cable from the bat-
tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.

() Connect the side airbag assembly LH (side squib LH)
connector.

(d) Connect the negative (-) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:

(@  Turnthe ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI-432).

(c) Turntheignition switchto LOCK, and waitatleastfor 10
seconds.

(d) Turntheignition switchto ON, and wait at least for 10se-
conds.

(e) Checkthe DTC (See page DI-432).

K:

DTCBO 117/45is notoutput.

HINT:

Codesotherthancode B0 117/45may be outputatthistime, but

they are not relevant to this check.

NG>

Replace side airbag assembly LH
(side squib LH).

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check. If the malfunctioning part can not be
detected by the simulation method, replace all SRS components including the wire harness.
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